Montana, session 2025, SB230.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 41-3-202, MCA, is amended to read:
"41-3-202. Action on reporting. (1) (a) Upon receipt of a report that a child is or has been abused or
neglected, the department shall promptly assess the information contained in the report and make a
determination regarding the level of response required and the timeframe within which action must be initiated.
(b) (i) Except as provided in subsections (1)(b)(ii) and (1)(b)(iii), upon receipt of a report that
includes an allegation of sexual abuse or sexual exploitation when the alleged perpetrator of the sexual abuse
or sexual exploitation was 12 years of age or older or if the department determines during any investigation that
the circumstances surrounding an allegation of child abuse or neglect include an allegation of sexual abuse or
sexual exploitation when the alleged perpetrator of the sexual abuse or sexual exploitation was 12 years of age
or older, the department shall immediately report the allegation to the county attorney of the county in which the
acts that are the subject of the report occurred.
(ii) If a victim of sexual abuse or sexual exploitation has attained the age of 14 and has sought
services from a contractor as described in 41-3-201(2)(j) that provides confidential services to victims of sexual
assault, conditioned upon an understanding that the criminal conduct will not be reported by the department to
the county attorney in the jurisdiction in which the alleged crime occurred, the department may not report
pursuant to 41-3-205(5)(d) and subsection (1)(b)(i) of this section.
(iii) If the department or law enforcement determines that the allegation involves the county
attorney or an employee in the county attorney's office in the county in which the acts that are subject to
reporting occurred, the department or law enforcement shall report as required in subsection (1)(b)(i) to the
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 230

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 230.1
attorney general.
(c) If the department determines that an investigation and a safety and risk assessment are
required, a child protection specialist shall promptly conduct a thorough investigation into the circumstances
surrounding the allegations of abuse or neglect of the child and perform a safety and risk assessment to
determine whether the living arrangement presents an unsafe environment for the child. The safety and risk
assessment may include an investigation at the home of the child involved, the child's school or day-care
facility, or any other place where the child is present and into all other nonfinancial matters that in the discretion
of the investigator are relevant to the safety and risk assessment. In conducting a safety and risk assessment
under this section, a child protection specialist may not inquire into the financial status of the child's family or of
any other person responsible for the child's care, except as necessary to ascertain eligibility for state or federal
assistance programs or to comply with the provisions of 41-3-446.
(2) An initial investigation of alleged abuse or neglect may be conducted when an anonymous
report is received. However, if the initial investigation does not within 48 hours result in the development of
independent, corroborative, and attributable information indicating that there exists a current risk of physical or
psychological harm to the child, a child may not be removed from the living arrangement. If independent,
corroborative, and attributable information indicating an ongoing risk results from the initial investigation, the
department shall then conduct a safety and risk assessment.
(3) The child protection specialist is responsible for conducting the safety and risk assessment. If
the child is treated at a medical facility, the child protection specialist, county attorney, or peace officer,
consistent with reasonable medical practice, has the right of access to the child for interviews, photographs,
and securing physical evidence and has the right of access to relevant hospital and medical records pertaining
to the child. If an interview of the child is considered necessary, the child protection specialist, county attorney,
or peace officer may conduct an interview of the child. The interview may be conducted in the presence of the
parent or guardian or an employee of the school or day-care facility attended by the child.
(4) Subject to 41-3-205(3), if the child's interview is audiotaped or videotaped, an unedited
audiotape or videotape with audio track must be made available, upon request, for unencumbered review by
the family.
(5) (a) If from the safety and risk assessment the department has reasonable cause to suspect that
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 230

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 230.1
the child is suffering abuse or neglect, the department may provide emergency protective services to the child if
the child is in immediate or imminent danger of harm, pursuant to 41-3-301, or enter into a written prevention
plan, pursuant to 41-3-302, and may provide protective services to any other child under the same care. The
department shall:
(i) after interviewing the parent or guardian, if reasonably available, document the determinations
of the safety and risk assessment; and
(ii) notify the child's family of the determinations of the safety and risk assessment, unless the
notification can reasonably be expected to result in harm to the child or other person.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (5)(c), the department shall destroy all safety and risk
assessment determinations and associated records, except for medical records, within 30 days after the end of
the 3-year period starting from the date of completion of the safety and risk assessment.
(c) Safety and risk assessment determinations and associated records may be maintained for a
reasonable time as defined by department rule under the following circumstances:
(i) the safety and risk assessment determines that abuse or neglect occurred;
(ii) there had been a previous or there is a subsequent report and investigation resulting in a
safety and risk assessment concerning the same person; or
(iii) an order has been issued by a court of competent jurisdiction adjudicating the child as a youth
in need of care based on the circumstances surrounding the initial allegations.
(6) The investigating child protection specialist, within 60 days of commencing an investigation,
shall also furnish a written safety and risk assessment to the department and, upon request, to the family.
Subject to time periods set forth in subsections (5)(b) and (5)(c), the department shall maintain a record system
documenting investigations and safety and risk assessment determinations. Unless records are required to be
destroyed under subsections (5)(b) and (5)(c), the department shall retain records relating to the safety and risk
assessment, including case notes, correspondence, evaluations, videotapes, and interviews, for 25 years.
(7) Any person reporting abuse or neglect that involves acts or omissions on the part of a public or
private residential institution, home, facility, or agency is responsible for ensuring that the report is made to the
department.
(8) The department shall, upon request from any reporter of alleged child abuse or neglect, verify
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – SB 230

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 230.1
whether the report has been received, describe the level of response and timeframe for action that the
department has assigned to the report, and confirm that it is being acted upon."

Section 2. Section 41-3-301, MCA, is amended to read:
"41-3-301. Emergency protective services. (1) (a) Any child protection specialist of the department,
a peace officer, or the county attorney who has reason to believe any child is in immediate or apparent
imminent danger of harm may immediately remove the child and place the child in a protective facility. After
ensuring that the child is safe, the department may make a request for further assistance from the law
enforcement agency or take appropriate legal action.
(b) The person or agency placing the child shall notify the parents, parent, guardian, or other
person having physical or legal custody of the child of the placement at the time the placement is made or as
soon after placement as possible. Notification under this subsection (1)(b) must:
(i) include the reason for removal;
(ii) include information regarding the emergency protective services hearing within 5 days under
41-3-306, the required show cause hearing within 20 days, and the purpose of the hearings;
(iii) provide contact information for the child protection specialist, the child protection specialist's
supervisor, and the office of state public defender; and
(iv) advise the parents, parent, guardian, or other person having physical or legal custody of the
child that the parents, parent, guardian, or other person:
(A) has the right to receive a copy of the affidavit as provided in subsection (6);
(B) has the right to attend and participate in the emergency protective services hearing and the
show cause hearing, including providing statements to the judge;
(C) may have a support person present during any meeting with the child protection specialist
concerning emergency protective services, including the emergency protective services hearing provided for in
41-3-306; and
(D) may request that the child be placed in a kinship foster home as defined in 52-2-602.
(c) A copy of the notification required under subsection (1)(b) must be provided within 24 hours to
the office of state public defender.
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – SB 230

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 230.1
(2) If a child protection specialist, a peace officer, or the county attorney determines in an
investigation of abuse or neglect of a child that the child is in danger because of the occurrence of partner or
family member assault, as provided for in 45-5-206, or strangulation of a partner or family member, as provided
for in 45-5-215, against an adult member of the household or that the child needs protection as a result of the
occurrence of partner or family member assault or strangulation of a partner or family member against an adult
member of the household, the department shall take appropriate steps for the protection of the child, which may
include:
(a) making reasonable efforts to protect the child and prevent the removal of the child from the
parent or guardian who is a victim of alleged partner or family member assault or strangulation of a partner or
family member;
(b) making reasonable efforts to remove the person who allegedly committed the partner or family
member assault or strangulation of a partner or family member from the child's residence if it is determined that
the child or another family or household member is in danger of partner or family member assault or
strangulation of a partner or family member; and
(c) providing services to help protect the child from being placed with or having unsupervised
visitation with the person alleged to have committed partner or family member assault or strangulation of a
partner or family member until the department determines that the alleged offender has met conditions
considered necessary to protect the safety of the child.
(3) If the department determines that an adult member of the household is the victim of partner or
family member assault or strangulation of a partner or family member, the department shall provide the adult
victim with a referral to a domestic violence program.
(4) A child who has been removed from the child's home or any other place for the child's
protection or care may not be placed in a jail.
(5) The department may locate and contact extended family members upon placement of a child in
out-of-home care. The department may share information with extended family members for placement and
case planning purposes.
(6) If a child is removed from the child's home by the department, a child protection specialist shall
submit an affidavit regarding the circumstances of the emergency removal to the county attorney and provide a
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – SB 230

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 230.1
copy of the affidavit to the office of state public defender and, if possible, the parents or guardian within 2
working days of the emergency removal. An abuse and neglect petition must be filed in accordance with 41-3-
422 within 5 working days, excluding weekends and holidays, of the emergency removal of a child unless
arrangements acceptable to the agency for the care of the child have been made by the parents or a written
prevention plan has been entered into pursuant to 41-3-302.
(7) Except as provided in the federal Indian Child Welfare Act [or the Montana Indian Child Welfare
Act provided for in Title 41, chapter 3, part 13], if applicable, a show cause hearing must be held within 20 days
of the filing of the petition unless otherwise stipulated by the parties pursuant to 41-3-434.
(8) If the department determines that a petition for immediate protection and emergency protective
services must be filed to protect the safety of the child, the child protection specialist shall interview the parents
of the child to whom the petition pertains, if the parents are reasonably available, before the petition may be
filed. The district court may immediately issue an order for immediate protection of the child.
(9) The department shall make the necessary arrangements for the child's well-being as are
required prior to the court hearing. (Bracketed language in subsection (7) terminates June 30, 2025--sec. 55,
Ch. 716, L. 2023.)"
- END -
- 6 - Authorized Print Version – SB 230